North Dakota statutes. TITLE 27 Judicial Branch of Government
CHAPTER 27-15 Judicial Conference

27-15-01.
Judicial conference established.

There is established a judicial conference consisting of:

All judges of the supreme court and district courts.

The attorney general.

The dean of the university of North Dakota school of law.

Five members of the bar who are engaged in the practice of law who must be chosen by the board of governors of the state bar association.

All surrogate judges appointed by the supreme court under section 27-17-03.

Two municipal judges selected by the municipal judges’ association.

The clerk of the North Dakota supreme court.

Source:

S.L. 1927, ch. 124, § 1; R.C. 1943, § 27-1501; S.L. 1959, ch. 252, § 1; 1965, ch. 223, § 1; 1975, ch. 278, § 1; 1981, ch. 320, § 57; 1983, ch. 355, § 1; 1985, ch. 333, § 2; 1991, ch. 326, § 95.

Cross-References.

As to creation and duties of a judicial planning committee, see Administrative Rule 14, North Dakota Court Rules Annotated.

27-15-02.
Term of office — Vacancy — How filled.

The judges of the supreme court and district courts, the attorney general, the dean of the university of North Dakota school of law, and the surrogate judges shall hold office as members of the judicial conference during the time they occupy their respective official positions. The term of office of the two municipal judges is two years, except that of the municipal judges first appointed after July 1, 1985, one must be appointed for a term of one year. The term of office of the five members of the bar is five years, except that of the members of the bar first appointed after July 1, 1985, one must be appointed for a term of five years, one for a term of four years, one for a term of three years, one for a term of two years, and one for a term of one year. All terms of members serving on July 1, 1985, expire on December 31, 1985. Thereafter all terms commence on January first. A vacancy must be filled by the authority originally selecting the member.

Source:

S.L. 1927, ch. 124, § 2; R.C. 1943, § 27-1502; S.L. 1959, ch. 252, § 2; 1975, ch. 278, § 2; 1981, ch. 320, § 58; 1983, ch. 355, § 2; 1985, ch. 333, § 3; 1991, ch. 326, § 96.

27-15-03.
Organization of judicial conference — Rules of procedure.

At the request of the judicial conference, the state court administrator shall serve as the executive secretary of the judicial conference. The judicial conference shall make rules for its procedure, organization, election of officers, and the conduct of its business.

Source:

S.L. 1927, ch. 124, § 3; R.C. 1943, § 27-1503; S.L. 1985, ch. 333, § 4.

27-15-04.
Meetings.

The judicial conference shall meet at least twice in each year at such times and places as fixed by the conference.

Source:

S.L. 1927, ch. 124, § 4; R.C. 1943, § 27-1504; S.L. 1985, ch. 333, § 5.

27-15-05.
Duties.

The judicial conference shall:

Solicit, receive, and evaluate suggestions relating to the improvement of the administration of justice.

Consider and make recommendations to the supreme court for changes in rules, procedures, or any matter pertaining to the judicial system.

Coordinate continuing judicial education efforts for judges and support staff.

Establish methods for review of proposed legislation which may affect the operation of the judicial branch.

Source:

S.L. 1927, ch. 124, § 5; R.C. 1943, § 27-1505; S.L. 1967, ch. 245, § 3; 1985, ch. 333, § 6.

27-15-06.
Hearings — Subpoena of witnesses — Compelling testimony. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1985, ch. 333, § 8.

27-15-07.
Bureau of statistics — Duties of officers — Information required. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1977, ch. 269, § 1.

27-15-08.
Report and recommendations to governor — Suggestion of rules to supreme court. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1985, ch. 333, § 8.

27-15-09.
Meeting of judges. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1985, ch. 333, § 8.

27-15-10.
Compensation — Expenses.

No member of the conference is entitled to receive compensation for any services rendered in that capacity, but any necessary travel expenses, including mileage and subsistence, incurred by any member must be paid from funds appropriated for the purposes of the judicial conference from the supreme court budget.

Source:

S.L. 1927, ch. 124, § 10; R.C. 1943, § 27-1510; S.L. 1959, ch. 252, § 3; 1965, ch. 223, § 2; 1975, ch. 278, § 3; 1981, ch. 320, § 59; 1983, ch. 355, § 3; 1985, ch. 333, § 7.